Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-902
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Medical Assistance Act are to (1) reorganize and recodify statutes relating to the medical assistance program, (2) provide for implementation of the Medicaid Reform Plan, (3) clarify public policy relating to the medical assistance program, (4) provide for administration of the medical assistance program within the department, and (5) provide for legislative oversight and public comment regarding the medical assistance program.

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 2.